North Carolina, session 2025, HB984.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 90-94.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-94.1. Exemption for use or possession of hemp extract.cannabis.
(a) As used in this section, "hemp extract" means an extract from a cannabis plant, or a
mixture or preparation containing cannabis plant material, that has all of the following
characteristics:
(1) Is composed of less than nine-tenths of one percent (0.9%)
tetrahydrocannabinol by weight.
(2) Is composed of at least five percent (5%) cannabidiol by weight.
(3) Contains no other psychoactive substance.
(a1) As used in this section, "cannabis" has the same meaning as "marijuana" in
G.S. 90-87.
(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, an individual may possess or
use hemp extract, cannabis and is not subject to the penalties described in this Chapter, if the
individual satisfies all of the following criteria:
(1) Possesses or uses the hemp extract only to treat intractable epilepsy, as defined
in G.S. 90-113.101.cannabis as a participant in a registered research study, as
defined in G.S. 90-113.161, if the quantity of usable cannabis possessed does
not exceed an adequate supply, as determined by the institution conducting
the research study.
(2) Possesses, in close proximity to the hemp extract, a certificate of analysis that
indicates the hemp extract's ingredients, including its percentages of
tetrahydrocannabinol and cannabidiol by weight.cannabis, a written
certification, as defined in G.S. 90-113.161.
(3) Is a caregiver, as defined in G.S. 90-113.101.G.S. 90-113.161.
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Chapter, an individual who possesses
hemp extract cannabis lawfully under this section may administer hemp extract cannabis to
another person under the individual's care and is not subject to the penalties described in this
Chapter for administering the hemp extract cannabis to the person if the individual is the person's
caregiver, as defined in G.S. 90-113.101.G.S. 90-113.161.
(d) Any individual who possesses or uses hemp extract, cannabis, as defined under this
section, shall dispose of all residual oil from the extract any unused portions at a secure collection
*H984-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
box managed by a law enforcement agency. No criminal penalty shall attach for any violation of
this subsection."
SECTION 2. Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new Article
to read:
"Article 5I.
"Cannabis Treatment Research Act.
"§ 90-113.160. Short title.
(a) This act may be cited as the "North Carolina Cannabis Treatment Research Act."
(b) The purpose of this act is to regulate the research of cannabis as a treatment for
medical conditions.
"§ 90-113.161. Definitions.
The following definitions apply in this Article:
(1) Cannabis. – Has the same meaning as "marijuana" in G.S. 90-87 and refers to
quantities of 1.5 ounces or less.
(2) Caregiver. – An individual that is at least 18 years of age and a resident of
North Carolina who is a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of a patient and
is registered with the Department of Health and Human Services under
G.S. 90-113.162 who possesses a written statement dated and signed by a
physician that states all of the following:
a. The patient has been examined and is under the care of the physician.
b. The patient is participating in a registered cannabis research study.
(3) Database. – The Cannabis Treatment Research database, established by the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to this Article.
(4) Department. – The Department of Health and Human Services.
(5) Patient. – A person who has been diagnosed by a physician with one or more
medical conditions.
(6) Physician. – A person licensed under Article 1 of Chapter 90 of the General
Statutes who is in good standing to practice medicine in this State.
(7) Registered research study. – A study conducted by a research institution and
registered in the database.
(8) Research institution. – A hospital, university, laboratory, pharmaceutical
manufacturer, or private medical research corporation that has registered with
the Department to conduct cannabis research.
(9) Written certification. – A statement in a patient's medical records or a
statement signed by a physician with whom the patient has a bona fide
physician-patient relationship indicating that, in the physician's professional
opinion, the patient has a medical condition and the potential health benefits
of the medical use of cannabis would likely outweigh the health risks for the
patient.
"§ 90-113.162. Cannabis Treatment Research database; departmental duties.
(a) The Department shall create a secure and electronic Cannabis Treatment Research
database registry for the registration of research institutions, physicians, caregivers, and patients
as provided by this Article. All caregivers shall be required to register with the Department. Law
enforcement agencies are authorized to contact the Department to confirm a caregiver's
registration. The database shall consist of the following information to be provided by the
caregivers at the time of registration:
(1) The name and address of the caregiver.
(2) The name and address of the caregiver's patient.
(3) The name, address, and contact information for the institution conducting the
cannabis research study.
Page 2 House Bill 984-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(b) It is the responsibility of the institution conducting the research study to update the
Department if caregiver or patient contact information changes.
"§ 90-113.163. Immunity for institutions; confidentiality.
(a) On a case-by-case basis, research institutions may approve of dispensation to a
registered caregiver, as approved by this Article, cannabis acquired from another jurisdiction.
(b) Research institutions who approve of dispensation of cannabis to a registered
caregiver, as approved by this Article, shall inform the registered caregiver of the requirement
that disposal must be done at a secure collection box pursuant to G.S. 90-94.1.
(c) Research institutions and their employees shall not be subject to arrest or prosecution,
penalized or disciplined in any manner, or denied any right or privilege for researching the use
of cannabis or providing a written certification for the use of cannabis pursuant to this Article.
(d) The identities of the caregivers, patients, and research institutions reported to the
Department pursuant to this Article are confidential and are not matters of public record.
However, this information may be provided to law enforcement agencies pursuant to
G.S. 90-113.162.
"§ 90-113.164. North Carolina Cannabis Research Program.
(a) It is the intent of the General Assembly that any physician who issues a written
certification to a patient be permitted to participate in objective scientific research with persons
registered under G.S. 90-113.162 regarding the administration of cannabis as part of medical
treatment.
(b) The scientific research conducted under this Article may involve the development of
quality control, purity, and labeling standards for cannabis; sound advice and recommendations
on the best practices for the safe and efficient medical use of cannabis; and analysis of genetic
and healing properties of the many varied strains of cannabis to determine which strains may be
best suited for a particular medical condition or treatment.
(c) A research institution, physician, or person registered to conduct research under
G.S. 90-113.162 shall not be subject to arrest or prosecution, or penalized in any manner, or
denied any right or privilege for researching the use of cannabis or providing written certification
for the use of cannabis pursuant to this section."
SECTION 3. The provisions of this act are severable. If any provision of this act is
held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions
of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025, and applies to offenses
committed on or after that date.
House Bill 984-First Edition Page 3